Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-142.11
Assembled vehicle; application for certificate of title; procedure.

The owner of an assembled vehicle may apply for a certificate of title by presenting a certificate of title for one major component part, a bill of sale for all other major component parts replaced, a statement that an inspection has been conducted on the vehicle, and a vehicle identification number as described in section 60-148. The certificate of title shall indicate the year of the vehicle as the year application for title was made and the make of the vehicle as assembled.

Laws 2018, LB909, § 23;

Laws 2022, LB750, § 7.